Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.185

Loss of public funds—Illegal activity—Report to state auditor's office.

State agencies and local governments shall immediately report to the state auditor's office known or suspected loss of public funds or assets or other illegal activity. The state auditor must adopt policies as necessary to implement this section.

[ 2022 c 148 s 1; 1995 c 301 s 8.]